ru: Плавучесть лески: Быстротонущий; Плавающий; Нейтральная плавучесть; Медленнотонущий; Другое
pt-PT: Flutuabilidade da linha: Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Flutuabilidade neutra; Afundamento lento; Outro
hr-HR: Plovnost strune: Brzo tonuće; Plutajuće; Neutralna plovnost; Sporo tonuće; Ostalo
vi: Độ nổi của dây câu: Chìm nhanh; Nổi; Chìm lơ lửng; Chìm chậm; Khác
nb: Oppdrift for snor: Raskt synkende; Flytende; Nøytral oppdrift; Saktesynkende; Annet
nl: Drijfvermogen lijn: Snel zinkend; Drijvend; Neutraal drijfvermogen; Langzaam zinkend; Overige
de: Auftrieb der Schnur: Schnell sinkend; Schwimmend; Neutrale Schwimmfähigkeit; Langsam sinkend; Sonstige
ko: 낚싯줄 부력: 빠른 침강; 부유; 중성 부력; 느린 침강; 기타
th: แรงลอยตัวของเส้น: จมเร็ว; ลอย; ลอยระดับกลางน้ำ; จมช้า; อื่นๆ
sv: Flytkraft för lina: Snabbsjunkande; Flytande; Neutral flytkraft; Långsamt sjunkande; Övrigt
zh-TW: 線材浮力: 快速下沉; 浮水; 中性浮力; 緩慢下沉; 其他
el: Πλευστότητα σκοινιού: Γρήγορης βύθισης; Επιπλέον; Ουδέτερης πλευστότητας; Αργής βύθισης; Άλλο
lt-LT: Valo plūdrumas: Greitai skęstantis; Plūduriuojantis; Neutralaus plūdrumo; Lėtai skęstantis; Kita
hu: Zsinór felhajtóereje: Gyorsan süllyedő; Lebegő; Semleges felhajtóerejű; Lassan süllyedő; Egyéb
cs: Vztlaková síla: Rychle potápivé; Plovoucí; Neutrální vztlak; Pomalu potápivé; Jiné
it: Galleggiabilità della lenza: Affondamento rapido; Galleggiante; Galleggiabilità neutra; Affondamento lento; Altro
sk-SK: Vztlak linky: Rýchlo potápavé; Plávajúce; S neutrálnym vztlakom; Pomaly potápavé; Iné
fr: Flottabilité de la ligne: Coulant rapide; Flottant; Flottabilité neutre; Coulant lent; Autre
ro-RO: Flotabilitatea firului: Scufundare rapidă; Plutitor; Flotabilitate neutră; Scufundare lentă; Altele
fi: Siiman kelluvuus: Nopeasti uppoava; Kelluva; Neutraali; Hitaasti uppoava; Muu
sl-SI: Plovnost vrvice: Hitro toneča; Plavajoča; Nevtralna plovnost; Počasi toneča; Drugo
da: Snorens opdrift: Hurtigt synkende; Flydende; Neutral opdrift; Langsomt synkende; Andet
pl: Wyporność liny: Szybko tonąca; Pływająca; Z neutralną pływalnością; Powoli tonąca; Inne
bg-BG: Плаваемост на линията: Бързо потъващо; Плаващо; Неутрална плаваемост; Бавно потъващо; Друго
en: Line buoyancy: Fast sinking; Floating; Neutral buoyancy; Slow sinking; Other
es: Flotabilidad de la línea: Hundimiento rápido; Flotante; Flotabilidad neutra; Hundimiento lento; Otro
tr: Misina yüzdürme özelliği: Hızlı batan; Yüzen; Nötr yüzerlik; Yavaş batan; Diğer
zh-CN: 钓线浮力: 快沉; 浮水; 悬浮; 缓沉; 其他
pt-BR: Flutuabilidade da linha: Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Flutuabilidade neutra; Afundamento lento; Outro
ja: ライン浮力: ファストシンキング; フローティング; ニュートラル; スローシンキング; その他